Maryland, session 2025, HB0469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
20–603.
(b) (4) From any revenue generated in the City of Annapolis from the hotel
tax, Anne Arundel County shall distribute:
(i) 3% to a special fund to be used only to provide funds to the
Annapolis Art in Public Places Commission;
(ii) 3% to a special fund to be used only to provide funds to the Arts
Council of Anne Arundel County, Inc.;
(iii) 17% to a special fund to be used only to provide funds to [the
Annapolis and Anne Arundel County Conference and Visitors Bureau] VISIT ANNAPOLIS
AND ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, INC.; and
(iv) 3% to the Affordable Housing Trust Fund established under §
20.30.070 of the Code of the City of Annapolis to be used only for housing assistance
payments.
(c) (1) From the county’s share of revenue from the hotel tax, Anne Arundel
County shall distribute:
– 1 –

Ch. 536 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) 3% to a special fund to be used only to provide funds to the Arts
Council of Anne Arundel County, Inc.; and
(ii) 17% to a special fund to be used only to provide funds to [the
Annapolis and Anne Arundel County Conference and Visitors Bureau] VISIT ANNAPOLIS
AND ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, INC.
(e) (1) On or before November 1 each year, the Arts Council of Anne Arundel
County, Inc. and [the Annapolis and Anne Arundel County Conference and Visitors
Bureau] VISIT ANNAPOLIS AND ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, INC. shall report on their
use of hotel tax revenue during the preceding fiscal year to:
(i) the Anne Arundel County Executive;
(ii) the Mayor and City Council of the City of Annapolis; and
(iii) in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the House Committee on Ways and Means, and
the members of the General Assembly representing Anne Arundel County.
(2) The County Auditor of Anne Arundel County:
(i) may conduct an audit of the financial records of the Arts Council
of Anne Arundel County, Inc. or [the Annapolis and Anne Arundel County Conference and
Visitors Bureau] VISIT ANNAPOLIS AND ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, INC.; and
(ii) shall report any audit findings under item (i) of this paragraph
to the governing body of Anne Arundel County.
(3) (i) The City of Annapolis or Anne Arundel County may withhold
from appropriation special funds dedicated to the Arts Council of Anne Arundel County
under this section if the Council fails to:
1. submit the report required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection; or
2. correct any audit findings identified under paragraph (2)
of this subsection.
(ii) The City of Annapolis or Anne Arundel County may withhold
from appropriation special funds dedicated to [the Annapolis and Anne Arundel County
Conference and Visitors Bureau] VISIT ANNAPOLIS AND ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY,
INC. under this section if [the Bureau] VISIT ANNAPOLIS AND ANNE ARUNDEL
COUNTY, INC. fails to:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 536
1. submit the report required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection; or
2. correct any audit findings identified under paragraph (2)
of this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –